Massachusetts, session 194th, H3383.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 2 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 61. The song, “Roadrunner”, words and music by Jonathan Richman, as recorded
by Jonathan Richman and The Modern Lovers shall be the official rock song of the
Commonwealth.
of 1